test/src/morphology/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимимгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявольгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявольтькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявликкак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлизеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимимгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерявлимизьгак
